Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.06, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Contents of application; other information. (a) An application must: (1) state the full name, date of birth, sex, and either (i) the residence address of the applicant, or (ii) designated address under section 5B.05; (2) contain a description of the applicant, including the applicant's height in feet and inches, weight in pounds, eye color, and sex; the applicant's driving privileges; and the applicant's ability to operate a motor vehicle with safety; (3) state: (i) the applicant's Social Security number; or (ii) if the applicant does not have a Social Security number and is applying for a Minnesota identification card, instruction permit, or class D provisional or driver's license, that the applicant elects not to specify a Social Security number; (4) contain a notification to the applicant of the availability of a living will/health care directive designation on the license under section 171.07, subdivision 7; (5) include a method for the applicant to: (i) request a veteran designation on the license under section 171.07, subdivision 15, and the driving record under section 171.12, subdivision 5a; (ii) indicate a desire to make an anatomical gift under subdivision 3b, paragraph (e); (iii) as applicable, designate document retention as provided under section 171.12, subdivision 3c; (iv) indicate emergency contacts as provided under section 171.12, subdivision 5b; (v) indicate the applicant's race and ethnicity; (vi) indicate caretaker information as provided under section 171.12, subdivision 5c; and (vii) indicate a temporary mailing address separate from the applicant's residence address listed on the identification card or license; and (6) meet the requirements under section 201.161, subdivision 3. (b) Applications must be accompanied by satisfactory evidence demonstrating: (1) identity, date of birth, and any legal name change if applicable; and (2) for drivers' licenses and Minnesota identification cards that meet all requirements of the REAL ID Act: (i) principal residence address in Minnesota, including application for a change of address, unless the applicant provides a designated address under section 5B.05; (ii) Social Security number, or related documentation as applicable; and (iii) lawful status, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 6, section 37.3. (c) An application for an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identification card must be accompanied by: (1) satisfactory evidence demonstrating the applicant's full legal name and United States citizenship; and (2) a photographic identity document. (d) An application form must deleted text begin notdeleted text end provide for identification of (1) the accompanying documents used by an applicant to demonstrate identity, deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin andnew text end (2) deleted text begin except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c),deleted text end the applicant's citizenship, immigration status, or lawful presence in the United States. deleted text begin The commissioner and a driver's license agent must not inquire about an applicant's citizenship, immigration status, or lawful presence in the United States, except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c).deleted text end (e) A Minnesota driver's license or identification card must be issued only to an individual who has a residence address in the state at the time of the application. Applications for an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identification card must include proof of residency in accordance with section 171.063, subdivision 6. An individual may only have one residence address where the individual is domiciled at any particular time. The residence address of the individual is presumed to continue until the contrary is shown. The applicant must provide the following information about the residence address: residence number, street name, street type, directional, city or town, state, and zip code. (f) If an applicant designates a temporary mailing address under paragraph (a), clause (5), item (vii), the commissioner must use the temporary mailing address in lieu of the applicant's residence address for delivery of the driver's license or identification card. The commissioner must send all other correspondence to the applicant's residence address. Nothing in this paragraph or paragraph (a), clause (5), item (vii), may be construed to modify or remove proof of residency requirements at the time of application for an initial driver's permit, driver's license, or identification card. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. License; contents and design. (a) Upon the payment of the required fee, the department shall issue to every qualifying applicant a license designating the type or class of vehicles the applicant is authorized to drive as applied for. This license must bear: (1) a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee; (2) the licensee's full name and date of birth; (3) either (i) the licensee's residence address, or (ii) the designated address under section 5B.05; (4) a description of the licensee in a manner as the commissioner deems necessary; (5) the usual signature of the licensee; and (6) designations and markings as provided in this section. No license is valid unless it bears the usual signature of the licensee. Every license must bear a colored photograph or an electronically produced image of the licensee. (b) If the United States Postal Service will not deliver mail to the applicant's residence address as listed on the license, then the applicant shall provide verification from the United States Postal Service that mail will not be delivered to the applicant's residence address and that mail will be delivered to a specified alternate mailing address. When an applicant provides an alternate mailing address under this subdivision, the commissioner shall use the alternate mailing address in lieu of the applicant's residence address for all notices and mailings to the applicant. (c) Every license issued to an applicant under the age of 21 must be of a distinguishing color and plainly marked "Under-21." (d) A license issued to an applicant age 65 or over must be plainly marked "senior" if requested by the applicant. (e) Except for a noncompliant license, a license must bear a distinguishing indicator for compliance with requirements of the REAL ID Act. (f) A noncompliant license must: (1) be marked "not for federal identification" on the face and in the machine-readable portion; (2) have a unique design or color indicator for purposes of the REAL ID Act; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) deleted text begin bear no indicator or design that relates to the lawful presence or the citizenship of the license holder.deleted text end new text begin be marked "citizen" on the face and in the machine-readable portion if the applicant presented proof of United States citizenship in the application;new text end new text begin (4) be marked "legal resident" on the face and in the machine-readable portion if the applicant presented proof of permanent lawful presence in the United States in the application; and new text end new text begin (5) be marked "temporary status" on the face and in the machine-readable portion if the applicant presented proof of temporary lawful status or admission period in the application. new text end (g) A REAL ID compliant license issued to a person with temporary lawful status or admission period must be marked "temporary" on the face and in the machine-readable portion. new text begin (h) A REAL ID compliant license issued to a person who is a United States citizen must be marked "U.S. Citizen" on the face and in the machine-readable portion. new text end deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end A license must display the licensee's full name or no fewer than 39 characters of the name. Any necessary truncation must begin with the last character of the middle name and proceed through the second letter of the middle name, followed by the last character of the first name and proceeding through the second letter of the first name. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Identification card; content and design; fee. (a) Upon payment of the required fee, the department shall issue to every qualifying applicant a Minnesota identification card. The department may not issue a Minnesota identification card to an individual who has a driver's license, other than a limited license. The department may not issue an enhanced identification card to an individual who is under 16 years of age, not a resident of this state, or not a citizen of the United States of America. The card must bear: (1) a distinguishing number assigned to the applicant; (2) a colored photograph or an electronically produced image of the applicant; (3) the applicant's full name and date of birth; (4) either (i) the licensee's residence address, or (ii) the designated address under section 5B.05; (5) a description of the applicant in the manner as the commissioner deems necessary; (6) the usual signature of the applicant; and (7) designations and markings provided under this section. (b) If the United States Postal Service will not deliver mail to the applicant's residence address as listed on the Minnesota identification card, then the applicant shall provide verification from the United States Postal Service that mail will not be delivered to the applicant's residence address and that mail will be delivered to a specified alternate mailing address. When an applicant provides an alternate mailing address under this subdivision, the commissioner shall use the alternate mailing address in lieu of the applicant's residence address for all notices and mailings to the applicant. (c) Each identification card issued to an applicant under the age of 21 must be of a distinguishing color and plainly marked "Under-21." (d) Each Minnesota identification card must be plainly marked "Minnesota identification card - not a driver's license." (e) Except for a noncompliant identification card, a Minnesota identification card must bear a distinguishing indicator for compliance with requirements of the REAL ID Act. (f) A noncompliant identification card must: (1) be marked "not for federal identification" on the face and in the machine-readable portion; (2) have a unique design or color indicator for purposes of the REAL ID Act; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) deleted text begin bear no indicator or design that relates to the lawful presence or the citizenship of the identification card holder.deleted text end new text begin be marked "citizen" on the face and in the machine-readable portion if the applicant presented proof of United States citizenship in the application;new text end new text begin (4) be marked "legal resident" on the face and in the machine-readable portion if the applicant presented proof of permanent lawful presence in the United States in the application; and new text end new text begin (5) be marked "temporary status" on the face and in the machine-readable portion if the applicant presented proof of temporary lawful status or admission period in the application. new text end (g) A REAL ID compliant Minnesota identification card issued to a person with temporary lawful status or admission period must be marked "temporary" on the face and in the machine-readable portion. new text begin (h) A REAL ID compliant license issued to a person who is a United States citizen must be marked "U.S. Citizen" on the face and in the machine-readable portion. new text end deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end A Minnesota identification card must display the cardholder's full name or no fewer than 39 characters of the name. Any necessary truncation must begin with the last character of the middle name and proceed through the second letter of the middle name, followed by the last character of the first name and proceeding through the second letter of the first name. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end The fee for a Minnesota identification card is 50 cents when issued to a person who is developmentally disabled, as defined in section 252A.02, subdivision 2; a physically disabled person, as defined in section 169.345, subdivision 2; or, a person with mental illness, as described in section 245.462, subdivision 20, paragraph (c).